District of Columbia statutes.
5-1332

Design and construction.

(a)

The Mayor shall obtain and review the design and plans for the memorial and, after consultation with the Council and the Joint Committee on Judicial Administration of the District of Columbia Courts, transmit recommendations to the Secretary of the Interior, the Commission of Fine Arts, and the National Capital Planning Commission before approval of the design, plans, and construction of the memorial in accordance with the Joint Resolution Authorizing the Law Enforcement Officers Memorial Fund to establish a memorial in the District of Columbia or its environs, approved October 19, 1984 (98 Stat. 2712) (“Joint Resolution”).

(b)

Construction shall not commence until the Secretary of the Interior determines that sufficient funds are available for the completion of the memorial in accordance with the Joint Resolution.

(c)

Construction shall commence no later than October 19, 1989, as provided in the Joint Resolution.

May 23, 1989, D.C. Law 8-2, § 3, 36 DCR 2371

History

1981 Ed., § 4-1122.

Prior Codifications